Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.0845

Evaluation and determination of individual with developmental disability—Program placement—Admissions, limitation.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

(1) A defendant found incompetent by the court under RCW 10.77.084 must be evaluated at the direction of the secretary and a determination made whether the defendant is an individual with a developmental disability. Such evaluation and determination must be accomplished as soon as possible following the court's placement of the defendant in the custody of the secretary.

(2) When appropriate, and subject to available funds, if the defendant is determined to be an individual with a developmental disability, he or she may be placed in a program specifically reserved for the treatment and training of persons with developmental disabilities where the defendant has the right to habilitation according to an individualized service plan specifically developed for the particular needs of the defendant. A copy of the evaluation must be sent to the program.

(a) The program must be separate from programs serving persons involved in any other treatment or habilitation program.

(b) The program must be appropriately secure under the circumstances and must be administered by developmental disabilities professionals who shall direct the habilitation efforts.

(c) The program must provide an environment affording security appropriate with the charged criminal behavior and necessary to protect the public safety.

(3) The department may limit admissions of such persons to this specialized program in order to ensure that expenditures for services do not exceed amounts appropriated by the legislature and allocated by the department for such services.

(4) The department may establish admission priorities in the event that the number of eligible persons exceeds the limits set by the department.

[ 2012 c 256 s 7.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Effective date—2012 c 256: See notes following RCW 10.77.068.